Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.145

Community or technical college faculty senate.

The boards of trustees of the various college districts may create at each community or technical college under their control a faculty senate or similar organization to be selected by periodic vote of the respective faculties thereof.

[ 1991 c 238 s 42; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 51. Formerly RCW 28.85.145.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.